lexc/adj/enhuadjoe.lexc
LEXICON Possik
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m   Famik;   ! m
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE4a§m   Famik;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d   Famik;   ! d
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE4a§d   Famik;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Famik;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§AE1§   Famik;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Famik;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k   Famik;   ! etek, atok
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE4a§t§OEOE§k   Famik;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Famik;   ! ük, uk
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§UUE1§k   Famik;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§AE§im   Famik;   ! aim
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Famik;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§AE§id   Famik;   ! aid
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Famik;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§AE§i   Famik;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Famik;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§AE§ink   Famik;   ! aink, eink
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Famik;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Famik;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Famik;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§AE§ik   Famik;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Famik;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Famik;
LEXICON Plurik
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez1e§k    Genik;
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez11e§k    Genik;
                            Genik;

LEXICON Famik
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Genik;
                       Genik;

LEXICON Genik
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Caseik;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Caseik;
                       Caseik;
  
LEXICON Caseik
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoezmid§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig

LEXICON AddAdjoeaejaje
0:^+cMid§oeoebb§bb Tocase1oe;  !körkörösebbek nem körkörösebbök!
@U.ART.ABSENT@  Tocaseoeaejaje;

Lexicon Tocaseoeaejaje
[stem]+Adj:0     Possoeaejaje;
[stem]+Adj:0     Pluroe;
[stem]+Adj:0     Famoe;

LEXICON Possoeaejaje
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3oe§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOAoe§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
!+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m        Genoe;  ! m
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1oe§m   Famoe;   ! m
!+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d        Genoe;  ! d
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1oe§d   Famoe;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^^§J§§AE1§   Famoe;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^^§Jnull§§AE1§   Famoe;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Famoe;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1oe§t§OEOEoe§k   Famoe;   ! etek, atok
!+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k Genoe;  ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Famoe;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Famoe;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Famoe;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Famoe;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Famoe;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Famoe;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Famoe;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§Jnull§§UUE1§k   Famoe;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JPnull§§AE§im   Famoe;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JPnull§§AE§id   Famoe;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JPnull§§AE§i   Famoe;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JPnull§§AE§ink   Famoe;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JPnull§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Famoe;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JPnull§§AE§ik   Famoe;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik

LEXICON AddAdjoeat
0:^+cMid§oeoebb§bb Tocase1oe;  !körkörösebbek nem körkörösebbök!
@U.ART.ABSENT@  Tocaseoeat;

Lexicon Tocaseoeat
[stem]+Adj:0     Possoeat;
[stem]+Adj:0     Pluroeat;
[stem]+Adj:0     Famoe;

LEXICON Possoeat
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3oe§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOAoe§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
+Acc:^+cAcc^§AA§t       #;  ! ilyet olyat
!+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m        Genoe;  ! m
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1oe§m   Famoe;   ! m
!+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d        Genoe;  ! d
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1oe§d   Famoe;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^^§J§§AE1§   Famoe;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Famoe;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1oe§t§OEOEoe§k   Famoe;   ! etek, atok
!+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k Genoe;  ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Famoe;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Famoe;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Famoe;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Famoe;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Famoe;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Famoe;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Famoe;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik

LEXICON Pluroeat
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez1§k    Genoe;
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez1e§k    Genoe;
                            Genoe;

!result
!legeslegkedvesebbet
!legeslegkedvesebben
!legkedvesebbet
!legkedvesebben
!kedvesebbet
!kedvesebben
!kedveset
!kedvesen

LEXICON Adj
hőbölygős AddAdjoeat;
jelölt AddAdjoeaejaje;
nyekergős AddAdjoeat;
pergős AddAdjoeat;
rekesztős AddAdjoeat;
sebesült AddAdjoeaejaje;
termős AddAdjoeat;
zökögős AddAdjoeat;
LEXICON Adj1
acélerős AddAdjoeat;
adáskeresős AddAdjoeat;
adókeresős AddAdjoeat;
agyletépős AddAdjoeat;
alizarinvörös AddAdjoeat;
amarántvörös AddAdjoeat;
angolvörös AddAdjoeat;
antilopbőrös AddAdjoeat;
apróbetűs AddAdjoeat;
aranybetűs AddAdjoeat;
aranyfürtös AddAdjoeat;
asztrahánbőrös AddAdjoeat;
bagariabőrös AddAdjoeat;
barnásvörös AddAdjoeat;
bauxitvörös AddAdjoeat;
betegvörös AddAdjoeat;
birkabőrös AddAdjoeat;
bivalybőrös AddAdjoeat;
borbűzös AddAdjoeat;
bordóvörös AddAdjoeat;
borjúbőrös AddAdjoeat;
borvörös AddAdjoeat;
bronzvörös AddAdjoeat;
buzérvörös AddAdjoeat;
báránybőrös AddAdjoeat;
bíborvörös AddAdjoeat;
bökős AddAdjoeat;
bölcs AddAdjoeat;
büdös AddAdjoeat;
bőrös AddAdjoeat;
bűzös AddAdjoeat;
cinkvörös AddAdjoeat;
cinóbervörös AddAdjoeat;
cirillbetűs AddAdjoeat;
csörfös AddAdjoeat;
csütörtökös AddAdjoeat;
cápabőrös AddAdjoeat;
céklavörös AddAdjoeat;
disznóbőrös AddAdjoeat;
dudafürtös AddAdjoeat;
dísztökös AddAdjoeat;
dőltbetűs AddAdjoeat;
egészbőrös AddAdjoeat;
egészképernyős AddAdjoeat;
elsőcsütörtökös AddAdjoeat;
előbőrös AddAdjoeat;
előnyös AddAdjoeat;
ezüstbetűs AddAdjoeat;
fehérkesztyűs AddAdjoeat;
fejbőrös AddAdjoeat;
fellengzős AddAdjoeat;
felsőbőrös AddAdjoeat;
frisslevegős AddAdjoeat;
früstökös AddAdjoeat;
fénybetűs AddAdjoeat;
fókabőrös AddAdjoeat;
fürtös AddAdjoeat;
főzőtökös AddAdjoeat;
gránátvörös AddAdjoeat;
gyöngybetűs AddAdjoeat;
hajfürtös AddAdjoeat;
halványvörös AddAdjoeat;
határidős AddAdjoeat;
higanyvörös AddAdjoeat;
húsvörös AddAdjoeat;
infravörös AddAdjoeat;
jajvörös AddAdjoeat;
jobblépcsős AddAdjoeat;
kabaktökös AddAdjoeat;
kadmiumvörös AddAdjoeat;
kaméliavörös AddAdjoeat;
karmazsinvörös AddAdjoeat;
kecskebőrös AddAdjoeat;
keménytetős AddAdjoeat;
kerekbetűs AddAdjoeat;
kongóvörös AddAdjoeat;
korallvörös AddAdjoeat;
koronafürtös AddAdjoeat;
krezolvörös AddAdjoeat;
krómvörös AddAdjoeat;
kutyabőrös AddAdjoeat;
kárminvörös AddAdjoeat;
kérdős AddAdjoeat;
kölcsönös AddAdjoeat;
kövérbetűs AddAdjoeat;
középerős AddAdjoeat;
latinbetűs AddAdjoeat;
libabőrös AddAdjoeat;
lilásvörös AddAdjoeat;
lopótökös AddAdjoeat;
lángvörös AddAdjoeat;
lóbőrös AddAdjoeat;
lóerős AddAdjoeat;
löttyös AddAdjoeat;
magvetős AddAdjoeat;
malacbőrös AddAdjoeat;
marokenbőrös AddAdjoeat;
meddős AddAdjoeat;
medvebőrös AddAdjoeat;
meggyvörös AddAdjoeat;
meleglevegős AddAdjoeat;
mélyvörös AddAdjoeat;
műbőrös AddAdjoeat;
nagycsütörtökös AddAdjoeat;
nagyképernyős AddAdjoeat;
narancsvörös AddAdjoeat;
neutrálvörös AddAdjoeat;
nyersbőrös AddAdjoeat;
paprikavörös AddAdjoeat;
parfümös AddAdjoeat;
perzsavörös AddAdjoeat;
pipacsvörös AddAdjoeat;
pirosbetűs AddAdjoeat;
pulykavörös AddAdjoeat;
párosevezős AddAdjoeat;
pöttyös AddAdjoeat;
rozsdavörös AddAdjoeat;
rubintvörös AddAdjoeat;
rubinvörös AddAdjoeat;
rumbatökös AddAdjoeat;
rákvörös AddAdjoeat;
rézvörös AddAdjoeat;
rókavörös AddAdjoeat;
skarlátvörös AddAdjoeat;
sorevezős AddAdjoeat;
svábtökös AddAdjoeat;
szalmatetős AddAdjoeat;
szamárbőrös AddAdjoeat;
szarvasbőrös AddAdjoeat;
szattyánbőrös AddAdjoeat;
szereplős AddAdjoeat;
szilvavörös AddAdjoeat;
szironybőrös AddAdjoeat;
százesztendős AddAdjoeat;
szügyelős AddAdjoeat;
szőkefürtös AddAdjoeat;
sápadtvörös AddAdjoeat;
sárgavesszős AddAdjoeat;
sárgásvörös AddAdjoeat;
sötétvörös AddAdjoeat;
süntökös AddAdjoeat;
sűrítettlevegős AddAdjoeat;
tehénbőrös AddAdjoeat;
teljesképernyős AddAdjoeat;
tánckettős AddAdjoeat;
téglavörös AddAdjoeat;
többfürtös AddAdjoeat;
többrésztvevős AddAdjoeat;
tökös AddAdjoeat;
törökvörös AddAdjoeat;
tősgyökös AddAdjoeat;
tűzvörös AddAdjoeat;
ultravörös AddAdjoeat;
vaskesztyűs AddAdjoeat;
vászontetős AddAdjoeat;
vérvörös AddAdjoeat;
vízitökös AddAdjoeat;
vörös AddAdjoeat;
zöldbőrös AddAdjoeat;
zöldcsütörtökös AddAdjoeat;
álbölcs AddAdjoeat;
áldozócsütörtökös AddAdjoeat;
állatbőrös AddAdjoeat;
átokerős AddAdjoeat;
égővörös AddAdjoeat;
élénkvörös AddAdjoeat;
ördöngős AddAdjoeat;
üstökös AddAdjoeat;
őzbőrös AddAdjoeat;
